Massachusetts, session 194th, H3511.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there is hereby established
within the executive office of energy and environmental affairs a Lithium-Ion Car Vehicle
Battery Advisory Group to review, and advise the legislature on policies pertaining to the
recovery and recycling of lithium-ion vehicle batteries sold within motor vehicles in the
commonwealth. The advisory group shall consult with local universities and research institutions
that have conducted research in the area of battery recycling, manufacturers of electric and
hybrid vehicles, and the recycling industry.
The advisory group shall consist of: the secretary of energy and environmental affairs, or
a designee, who shall serve as chair; the commissioner of environmental protection, or a
of 2

designee; one member of the toxics use reduction institute; 3 members to be appointed by the
governor, 1 member of the senate to be appointed by the senate president, 1 member of the house
of representatives to be appointed by the speaker, 1 member of the senate appointed by the
senate minority leader, and 1 member of the house of representatives to be appointed by the
house minority leader.
The Lithium-Ion Car Battery Recycling Advisory Group shall submit its final report of
the findings and recommendations to the executive office of energy and environmental affairs;
the department of environmental protection; the joint committee on environment, natural
resources and agriculture; and the clerks of the senate and the house of representatives no later
than 1 year after the passage of this bill.
of 2